Hawaii statutes.
[§205-45.5] Important agricultural land;
farm dwellings and employee housing. A landowner whose agricultural lands
are designated as important agricultural lands may develop, construct, and
maintain farm dwellings and employee housing for farmers, employees, and their
immediate family members on these lands; provided that:

(1) The farm dwellings and employee housing units
shall be used exclusively by farmers and their immediate family members who
actively and currently farm on important agricultural land upon which the
dwelling is situated; provided further that the immediate family members of a
farmer may live in separate dwelling units situated on the same designated
land;

(2) Employee housing units shall be used exclusively
by employees and their immediate family members who actively and currently work
on important agricultural land upon which the housing unit is situated;
provided further that the immediate family members of the employee shall not
live in separate housing units and shall live with the employee;

(3) The total land area upon which the farm dwellings
and employee housing units and all appurtenances are situated shall not occupy
more than five per cent of the total important agricultural land area
controlled by the farmer or the employee's employer or fifty acres, whichever
is less;

(4) The farm dwellings and employee housing units
shall meet all applicable building code requirements;

(5) Notwithstanding section 205-4.5(a)(12), the
landowner shall not plan or develop a residential subdivision on the important
agricultural land;

(6) Consideration may be given to the cluster
development of farm dwellings and employee housing units to maximize the land
area available for agricultural production; and

(7) The plans for farm dwellings and employee housing
units shall be supported by agricultural plans that are approved by the
department of agriculture. [L 2008, c 233, §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next